Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 5. Statewide Suicide Prevention Council.

Sec. 44.29.300.
Council established.

There is established in the Department of Health and Social Services the Statewide Suicide Prevention Council, consisting of 17 members, as follows:

two members of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, one of whom shall be a member of the majority and one of whom shall be a member of the minority;

two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one of whom shall be a member of the majority and one of whom shall be a member of the minority;

13 members appointed by the governor, as follows:

two persons who are employed in the executive branch of state government, one of whom shall represent the Department of Health and Social Services and one of whom shall represent the Department of Education and Early Development;

one member of the Advisory Board on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse;

one member of the Alaska Mental Health Board;

one person recommended by the Alaska Federation of Natives, Inc.;

one person who is an employee of a secondary school;

one person who is active in a youth organization;

one person who has experienced the death by suicide of a member of the person’s family;

one person who resides in a rural community in the state that is not connected by road or the Alaska marine highway to the main road system of the state;

one person who is a member of the clergy;

one person who, when appointed, is at least 16 years of age but not more than 24 years of age;

one person who is discharged from, retired from, or engaged in active duty military service in the armed forces of the United States, including the United States Coast Guard, the Army National Guard, the Air National Guard, or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States, or who is a mental health provider, social worker, or other person actively providing a health care service to discharged, retired, or active military personnel; and

one public member.

Members of the council appointed under (a)(1) and (2) of this section are nonvoting members.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2001; am §§ 1, 2 ch 43 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “16 members” for “15 members”; in (a)(3), in the introductory language, substituted “12 members” for “11 members”; in (a)(3)(A), added “, one of whom shall represent the Department of Health and Social Services and one of whom shall represent the Department of Education and Early Development”; in (a)(3)(E), substituted “an employee of” for “a counselor in”; in (a)(3)(F), substituted “person” for “adult” and deleted “statewide” preceding “youth organization”; in (a)(3)(J), added “enrolled in grade nine, 10, 11, or 12 of a secondary school in the state; and” following “one person who”, and deleted “under the age of 18”; added (a)(3)(K), and made a related stylistic change; added (b).

The 2012 amendment, effective August 21, 2012, in the lead-in language in (a) substituted “consisting of 17 members” for “consisting of 16 members”, in (a)(3) substituted “13 members appointed” for “12 members appointed”, in (a)(3)(J) substituted “when appointed, is at least 16 years of age but not more than 24 years of age;” for “is enrolled in grade nine, 10, 11, or 12 of a secondary school in the state; and”, added (a)(3)(K), and redesignated former (a)(3)(K) as (a)(3)(L).

Sec. 44.29.310.
Term of office.

The governor shall appoint the members of the council under AS

44.29.300(a)(3)(D)

— (L) for staggered terms of four years.

The governor shall fill a vacancy of a member on the council appointed under AS

44.29.300(a)(3)(D)

— (L) by appointment for the unexpired part of the vacated term.

Members of the council serve at the pleasure of the governor. The governor shall replace a member who, by poor attendance or lack of contribution to the council’s work, demonstrates ineffectiveness as a member. In this subsection, “poor attendance” means the failure to attend three or more consecutive meetings.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2001; am §§ 2, 3 ch 33 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2009, in each of subsections (a) and (b), “AS

44.29.300

(a)(3)(D) — (J)” was substituted for “AS

44.29.300

(3)(D) — (J)” to reflect the addition of AS

44.29.300(b)

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective August 21, 2012, in (a) and (b), substituted “AS

44.29.300(a)(3)(D)

— (L)” for “AS

44.29.300(a)(3)(D)

— (J)”.

Sec. 44.29.320.
Compensation, per diem, and expenses.

The members of the council who are not state employees are not entitled to compensation for service on the council, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2001)

Sec. 44.29.330.
Officers and staff.

The council, by a majority of its voting membership, shall annually elect a presiding officer and other officers it considers necessary from among its membership.

The council may employ a coordinator to assist the council. The coordinator is in the partially exempt service. The coordinator shall be directly responsible to the council in the performance of the coordinator’s duties. The council shall annually review the performance of the coordinator.

The council may appoint an advisory panel to provide further advice on suicide prevention. The advisory panel serves at the pleasure of the council. Members of the advisory panel are not entitled to compensation, per diem, or reimbursement of travel expenses.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2001; am § 3 ch 43 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (a), added “voting” following “by a majority of its”.

Sec. 44.29.340.
Meetings; quorum.

The council may meet and vote, by teleconference or otherwise, as often as considered necessary by the presiding officer of the council.

Seven voting members of the council participating in a meeting in person or by teleconference constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and the exercise of the powers and duties of the council.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2001; am § 4 ch 43 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, added (b).

The 2010 amendment, effective July 13, 2010, in (a), added “and vote” following “The council may meet”; in (b), added “participating in a meeting in person or by teleconference” following “Seven voting members of the council”.

Sec. 44.29.350.
Duties.

The council shall serve in an advisory capacity to the legislature and the governor with respect to what actions can and should be taken to

improve health and wellness throughout the state by reducing suicide and its effect on individuals, families, and communities;

broaden the public’s awareness of suicide and the risk factors related to suicide;

enhance suicide prevention services and programs throughout the state;

develop healthy communities through comprehensive, collaborative, community-based, and faith-based approaches;

develop and implement a statewide suicide prevention plan;

strengthen existing and build new partnerships between public and private entities that will advance suicide prevention efforts in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2001)

Sec. 44.29.360.
Annual report.

The council shall annually report its findings and recommendations in a report to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives by March 1 of each year.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2001)

Sec. 44.29.390.
Definition.

In AS

44.29.300

—

44.29.390

, “council” means the Statewide Suicide Prevention Council established under AS

44.29.300

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2001)